Hawaii statutes.
§652-3 Amount withheld. For the
purposes of garnishment, if it appears in any cause wherein service has been
made as provided by law, whether before or after judgment, upon any garnishee
from whom the defendant is in receipt of any wages, the court shall order and
direct the garnishee not to withhold more than a portion of the wages of the
defendant to be determined as provided for in the third paragraph of subsection
(a) of section 652-1. The garnishee shall continue such withholding from the
wages of the defendant until the action against the defendant has been finally
determined and the final judgment obtained against the defendant, if any, has
been fully paid with legal interest thereon. However, no more of the wages
shall be withheld from the defendant in advance of final judgment than shall be
sufficient to meet the demand of the plaintiff, together with cost and legal
interest. [L 1907, c 99, §1; am L 1921, c 66, §1; RL 1925, §2828; am L 1925, c
262, §3; am L 1927, c 96, §3; am L 1933, c 172, §1; RL 1935, §4272; am L 1939,
c 212, §2; RL 1945, §10303; RL 1955, §237-3; am L 1959, c 65, §3; HRS §652-3;
gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Adjustment of set-off to period before and after judgment.
19 H. 83 (1908).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next